Washington statutes.
RCW 43.15.080

Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Travel expenses.

The members of the committee shall serve without additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 44.04.120, incurred while attending sessions of the committee or meetings of any subcommittee of the committee, while engaged on other committee business authorized by the committee, and while going to and coming from committee sessions or committee meetings.

[ 1985 c 467 s 21. Formerly RCW 44.52.050.]